Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Criminal Prosecutions

15.190.
Assistance in criminal proceedings on request of local prosecuting officials.

County and Commonwealth attorneys may request in writing the assistance of the Attorney General in the conduct of any criminal investigation or proceeding. The Attorney General may take such action as he deems appropriate and practicable under the circumstances in the rendering of such assistance.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 28, § 1.

15.200.
May intervene or direct criminal proceeding on request of Governor, President of the Senate, Speaker of the House of Representatives, or court or grand jury — Subpoenas.

Whenever requested in writing by:

The Governor:

The President of the Senate or Speaker of the House of Representatives of the General Assembly;

Any of the courts or grand juries of the Commonwealth; or

A sheriff, mayor, or majority of a city legislative body;

stating that his or her participation in a given case is desirable to effect the administration of justice and the proper enforcement of the laws of the Commonwealth, the Attorney General may intervene, participate in, or direct any investigation or criminal action, or portions thereof, within the Commonwealth of Kentucky necessary to enforce the laws of the Commonwealth.

The Attorney General may subpoena witnesses, secure testimony under oath for use in civil or criminal trials, investigations or hearings affecting the Commonwealth, its departments or political subdivisions.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 28, § 2; 1966, ch. 255, § 7; 2021 ch. 173, § 5, effective June 29, 2021.

15.205.
Attorney General may direct Commonwealth’s attorney or county attorney to act as special prosecutor.

When the Attorney General has been requested to participate in a given case pursuant to KRS

15.200

, the Attorney General may, at his own discretion, direct that a Commonwealth’s attorney or county attorney from another circuit or district participate in the case as a special prosecutor for the Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 26, § 3; 1972, ch. 203, § 1; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 17, § 17, effective January 1, 1978.

15.210.
Authority in criminal prosecutions.

Whenever the Attorney General shall undertake any of the actions prescribed herein, he shall be authorized to exercise all powers and perform all duties in respect to such criminal actions or proceedings which the prosecuting attorney would otherwise perform or exercise, including, but not limited to the authority to sign, file and present any and all complaints, affidavits, information, presentments, accusations, indictments, subpoenas, and processes of any kind, and to appear before all grand juries, courts or tribunals.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 28, § 3; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 3, effective January 2, 1978.

15.220.
Power of Attorney General not to affect powers or duties of local officers.

Except as provided in KRS

15.190

to

15.240

, the powers and duties conferred upon or required of the Attorney General by KRS

15.190

to

15.240

shall not be construed to deprive prosecuting attorneys of any of their authority in respect to criminal prosecutions, or relieve them from any of their duties to enforce the criminal laws of the Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 28, § 4; 1966, ch. 255, § 8.

15.225.
Investigation of county financial administration — Report.

After the examination of each county’s financial administration by the Auditor of Public Accounts as provided in KRS

43.070

, and receipt of a written report from the Auditor of Public Accounts as required by KRS

43.090

, the Attorney General may conduct such investigation as is necessary to determine if prosecution is warranted and may, in his discretion, prosecute any violation of law.

In the event the books of a county official are audited by a certified public accountant in lieu of the audit conducted by the Auditor of Public Accounts as provided in KRS

64.810

, the Attorney General may conduct such investigation as is necessary to determine if prosecution is warranted and may, in his discretion, prosecute any violation of law.

Where an investigation is conducted by this section, the Attorney General shall, within six (6) months of the receipt of the audit as directed by KRS

43.090

and KRS

64.810

, make a written report regarding the results of his investigation to the Auditor of Public Accounts, the General Assembly, the Governor, the county attorney, and the Commonwealth’s attorney of the county examined. The report of the Attorney General shall include but need not be limited to the following:

A description of the allegations against the official;

A summary of the findings of the Attorney General’s investigation of such allegations;

The nature and disposition of any proceedings initiated against the official.

This section shall not be deemed to limit or to prohibit the investigation or prosecution of violations of law by other appropriate authorities.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 151, § 1, effective July 15, 1980.

15.230.
Costs of intervention by Attorney General, how paid. [Repealed.]

15.231.
Jurisdiction in criminal and civil cases involving theft of identity and trafficking in stolen identities.

The Attorney General shall have concurrent jurisdiction with Commonwealth’s attorneys and county attorneys for the prosecution of offenses under and the enforcement of the provisions of KRS

411.210

,

434.872

,

434.874

,

514.160

,

514.170

, and

532.034

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 174, § 5, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 175, § 2, effective July 15, 2002.

15.232.
Concurrent jurisdiction in investigation and prosecution of offenses under KRS 433.890 to 433.896, 433.900 to 433.906, and 512.090.

The Attorney General shall have concurrent jurisdiction with Commonwealth’s attorneys and county attorneys in the investigation and prosecution of offenses under KRS

433.890

to

433.896

,

433.900

to

433.906

, and

512.090

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 83, § 5, effective July 15, 2008; 2012, ch. 91, § 6, effective July 12, 2012.

15.240.
Authority of Attorney General to initiate or intervene in certain actions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary the Attorney General shall have authority to initiate actions or intervene in actions brought pursuant to the provisions of KRS Chapters 146, 151, 217B, 224 and 350.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 289, § 7.

15.241.
Attorney General’s powers to prevent, penalize, and remedy violations of laws relating to elective medical procedures, including abortions.

The Attorney General may seek injunctive relief as well as civil and criminal penalties in courts of proper jurisdiction to prevent, penalize, and remedy violations of:

KRS Chapter 216B regarding abortion facilities and the administrative regulations promulgated in furtherance thereof;

KRS

311.710

to

311.830

regarding abortions and the administrative regulations promulgated in furtherance thereof; and

KRS Chapter 39A and any orders or directives issued thereunder relating to elective medical procedures, including but not limited to abortions.

Nothing in this section shall limit or preclude such authority as the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services has to seek the relief set forth in subsection (1) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 582, § 7, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 78, effective June 20, 2005; 2021 ch. 4, § 1, effective February 2, 2021.

15.242.
Election law jurisdiction — Notice to Registry of Election Finance.

The Attorney General shall possess jurisdiction, concurrent with that of county and Commonwealth’s attorneys, to investigate and prosecute violations of the election laws. The Attorney General, county attorneys, and Commonwealth’s attorneys shall notify the Registry of Election Finance of any investigation or prosecution of alleged election law violations.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 341, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 288, § 48, effective July 14, 1992.

15.243.
Enforcement of all election laws — Duties of Attorney General — Toll-free line for report of violations — Random inquiry for irregularities — Initiation of prosecutions.

In addition to the other duties and powers of the Attorney General, he or she shall enforce all of the state’s election laws by civil or criminal processes.

The Attorney General shall:

Devise and administer programs to observe the conduct of elections;

Hold public hearings;

Establish a toll-free telephone service for the purpose of receiving reports of election law violations. The service shall be operated during regular business hours throughout the year and during the hours which any poll in the state is open on the day of any primary, special election, or regular election;

Initiate investigations or investigate alleged violations of election laws at the request of a registered voter or on his or her own motion;

Issue subpoenas for the production of any books, papers, correspondence, memoranda or other records, and compel the attendance of witnesses that he or she deems relevant to the purposes of any investigation;

Present evidence of alleged violations to a grand jury; and

File appropriate complaints in any court of competent jurisdiction.

The Attorney General shall be required to begin an independent inquiry for any potential irregularities that may have occurred in each election in not fewer than twelve (12) of Kentucky’s counties, to be selected at random in a public process, within twenty (20) days following each primary or regular election. No county shall be subject to inquiry under this subsection in two (2) consecutive elections.

The Attorney General shall report his or her findings to the grand jury of each county involved and to the chief circuit judge for the circuit in which the county is located.

When the Registry of Election Finance concludes there is probable cause to believe a violation of election laws has occurred, it shall forward the matter to the Attorney General for prosecution. In the event the Attorney General or local prosecutor fails to prosecute the matter in a timely fashion, the registry’s attorney may petition the Circuit Court to be appointed as a special prosecutor. Upon such motion timely filed, for good cause shown, the court shall enter an order to that effect.

When requested by the Attorney General, all state and local agencies and officials, including the Auditor of Public Accounts, Commonwealth’s attorneys, county attorneys, Registry of Election Finance, Department of Kentucky State Police, sheriffs’ departments and local police shall give all possible assistance to the Attorney General in the performance of his or her duties.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 341, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 48, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 2007, ch. 85, § 14, effective June 26, 2007; 2022 ch. 219, § 1, effective July 14, 2022.